Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-514.04
Health care providers; patient information or test results; confidentiality; release of information.

(1) Information concerning any patient or test results obtained under section 71-514.03 shall be maintained as confidential by the health care facility that received or tested the patient, the patient's attending physician, the health care provider, and the provider agency except as provided by section 71-503.01 and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such section. Such information shall not be made public upon subpoena, search warrant, discovery proceedings, or otherwise except as provided by such section.

(2) The information described in subsection (1) of this section may be released with the written consent of the patient or, if the patient is deceased or incapable of giving informed consent, with the written consent of his or her next of kin, legal guardian, or personal representative of his or her estate.

Laws 1994, LB 819, § 10.